nb: Elektrisk gitar brotype: 2-punkts tremolo; 6-skruers tremolo; Bigsby; Fast (hardtail); Floyd Rose (dobbeltlåsende tremolo); Synkronisert tremolo; Tune-o-matic med stopbar; Wraparound; Annet
es: Tipo de puente de guitarra eléctrica: Trémolo de 2 puntos; Trémolo de 6 tornillos; Bigsby; Fijo (hardtail); Floyd Rose (trémolo de doble bloqueo); Trémolo sincronizado; Tune-o-matic con cordal stopbar; Wraparound; Otro
hr-HR: Vrsta mosta za električnu gitaru: Tremolo s 2 točke; Tremolo sa 6 vijaka; Bigsby; Fiksni (hardtail); Floyd Rose (tremolo s dvostrukim zaključavanjem); Sinkronizirani tremolo; Tune-o-matic sa stopbarom; Wraparound; Ostalo
fr: Type de chevalet de guitare électrique: Tremolo à 2 points; Tremolo à 6 vis; Bigsby; Fixe (hardtail); Floyd Rose (tremolo à double blocage); Tremolo synchronisé; Tune-o-matic avec cordier; Wraparound; Autre
tr: Elektro gitar köprü türü: 2 noktalı tremolo; 6 vidalı tremolo; Bigsby; Sabit (hardtail); Floyd Rose (çift kilitli tremolo); Senkronize tremolo; Stopbarlı Tune-o-matic; Sarmal; Diğer
ja: エレキギターのブリッジタイプ: 2点支持トレモロ; 6点支持トレモロ; ビグスビー; 固定 (ハードテイル); フロイドローズ (ダブルロッキングトレモロ); シンクロナイズドトレモロ; チューン・オー・マチック (ストップバー付き); ラップアラウンド; その他
ru: Тип бриджа электрогитары: Тремоло на 2 винтах; Тремоло на 6 винтах; Bigsby; Фиксированный (хардтейл); Floyd Rose (тремоло с двойной фиксацией); Синхронизированное тремоло; Tune-o-matic со стопбаром; Wraparound; Другое
ro-RO: Chitară electrică tip punte: Tremolo cu 2 puncte de prindere; Tremolo cu 6 șuruburi; Bigsby; Fix (hardtail); Floyd Rose (tremolo cu blocare dublă); Tremolo sincronizat; Tune-o-matic cu stopbar; Wraparound; Altele
de: Stegtyp der E-Gitarre: 2-Punkt-Tremolo; 6-Punkt-Tremolo; Bigsby; Fixiert (Hardtail); Floyd Rose (Double-Locking Tremolo); Synchronized Tremolo; Tune-o-matic mit Stopbar; Wraparound; Sonstige
pt-BR: Tipo de ponte para guitarra elétrica: Tremolo de 2 pontos; Tremolo de 6 parafusos; Bigsby; Fixa (hardtail); Floyd Rose (tremolo com trava dupla); Tremolo sincronizado; Tune-o-matic com stopbar; Wraparound; Outro
zh-CN: 电吉他琴桥类型: 两点式颤音琴桥; 六点式颤音琴桥; Bigsby 颤音琴桥; 固定（固定琴桥）; Floyd Rose（双摇颤音系统）; 同步颤音琴桥; 带固定尾板的 Tune-o-matic 琴桥; 包裹式琴桥; 其他
it: Chitarra elettrica con ponte: Tremolo a 2 punti; Tremolo a 6 viti; Bigsby; Fisso (hardtail); Floyd Rose (tremolo a doppio bloccaggio); Tremolo sincronizzato; Tune-o-matic con stopbar; Wraparound; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta kobilice na električni kitari: 2-točkovni tremolo; 6-vijačni tremolo; Bigsby; Fiksni (hardtail); Floyd Rose (tremolo z dvojnim zaklepanjem); Sinhronizirani tremolo; Tune-o-matic s strunikom (stopbar); Ovijalni (wraparound); Drugo
th: ประเภทของบริดจ์กีตาร์ไฟฟ้า: คันโยก 2 จุด; คันโยก 6 น็อต; Bigsby; ยึดติด (ฮาร์ดเทล); Floyd Rose (คันโยกล็อกสาย 2 จุด); คันโยกซิงโครไนซ์; Tune-o-matic พร้อมสต็อปบาร์; แรปอะราวด์; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ kobylky pro elektrickou kytaru: Dvoubodové tremolo; Šestišroubové tremolo; Bigsby; Pevná (hardtail); Floyd Rose (dvojzvratné tremolo); Synchronizované tremolo; Tune-o-matic se struníkem; Wraparound; Jiné
nl: Elektrische gitaar brug type: 2-punts tremolo; 6-schroefs tremolo; Bigsby; Vast (hardtail); Floyd Rose (double-locking tremolo); Gesynchroniseerde tremolo; Tune-o-matic met stopbar; Wraparound; Overige
pt-PT: Ponte para guitarra elétrica: Tremolo de 2 pontos; Tremolo de 6 parafusos; Bigsby; Fixa (hardtail); Floyd Rose (tremolo de bloqueio duplo); Tremolo sincronizado; Tune-o-matic com stopbar; Wraparound; Outra
fi: Sähkökitaran tallatyyppi: 2-pistetremolo; 6-ruuvinen tremolo; Bigsby; Kiinteä (hardtail); Floyd Rose (kaksoislukittuva tremolo); Synkronoitu tremolo; Tune-o-matic ja stopbar; Wraparound; Muu
en: Electric guitar bridge type: 2-point tremolo; 6-screw tremolo; Bigsby; Fixed (hardtail); Floyd Rose (double-locking tremolo); Synchronized tremolo; Tune-o-matic with stopbar; Wraparound; Other
da: Type af elektrisk guitarbro: 2-punkts tremolo; 6-skruers tremolo; Bigsby; Fast (hardtail); Floyd Rose (dobbeltlåsende tremolo); Synkroniseret tremolo; Tune-o-matic med stopbar; Wraparound; Andet
hu: Elektromos gitár húrláb típusa: 2-pontos tremoló; 6-csavaros tremoló; Bigsby; Fix (hardtail); Floyd Rose (kettős záras tremoló); Szinkronizált tremoló; Tune-o-matic stopbarral; Wraparound; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ kobylky elektrickej gitary: 2-bodové tremolo; 6-skrutkové tremolo; Bigsby; Pevná (hardtail); Floyd Rose (dvojzvratné tremolo so zámkami); Synchronizované tremolo; Tune-o-matic so stopbarom; Wraparound; Iné
pl: Typ mostka gitary elektrycznej: Tremolo 2-punktowe; Tremolo 6-śrubowe; Bigsby; Stały (hardtail); Floyd Rose (obustronnie blokowane tremolo); Zsynchronizowane tremolo; Tune-o-matic ze strunociągiem stopbar; Wraparound; Inne
ko: 일렉트릭 기타 브리지 유형: 2포인트 트레몰로; 6스크류 트레몰로; 빅스비; 픽스드(하드테일); 플로이드 로즈(더블 락킹 트레몰로); 싱크로나이즈드 트레몰로; 튠오매틱 및 스톱바; 랩어라운드; 기타
sv: Elgitarr – stalltyp: 2-punktstremolo; 6-skruvstremolo; Bigsby; Fast (hardtail); Floyd Rose (dubbellåsande tremolo); Synkroniserat tremolo; Tune-o-matic med stopbar; Wraparound; Övrigt
lt-LT: Elektrinės gitaros tiltelio tipas: 2 taškų tremolo; 6 varžtų tremolo; Bigsby; Fiksuotas („hardtail“); Floyd Rose (dvigubo užrakinimo tremolo); Sinchronizuotas tremolo; Tune-o-matic su „stopbar“; Wraparound; Kita
zh-TW: 電吉他琴橋類型: 兩點式顫音搖座; 六點式顫音搖座; Bigsby 顫音搖座; 固定式 (硬尾); Floyd Rose (雙鎖定顫音搖座); 同步顫音搖座; Tune-o-matic 附拉弦板; 包覆式琴橋; 其他
el: Τύπος γέφυρας ηλεκτρικής κιθάρας: Τρέμολο 2 σημείων; Τρέμολο 6 βιδών; Bigsby; Σταθερή (hardtail); Floyd Rose (τρέμολο διπλού κλειδώματος); Συγχρονισμένο τρέμολο; Tune-o-matic με stopbar; Wraparound; Άλλο
vi: Loại cầu đàn guitar điện: Tremolo 2 điểm; Tremolo 6 ốc; Bigsby; Cố định (hardtail); Floyd Rose (tremolo khóa kép); Tremolo đồng bộ; Tune-o-matic kèm stopbar; Wraparound; Khác
bg-BG: Тип мост на електрическа китара: 2-точково тремоло; Тремоло с 6 винта; Bigsby; Фиксиран (hardtail); Floyd Rose (тремоло с двойно заключване); Синхронизирано тремоло; Tune-o-matic със stopbar; Увивен; Друг